Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB243.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 2.147 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The nineteenth of June each year shall be observed in Kentucky as "Juneteenth
National Freedom Day."
(2) The Governor shall proclaim June 19 of each year as "Juneteenth National Freedom
Day" and will encourage all Kentuckians celebrating this day to honor and reflect
on the significant roles that African-Americans have played in the history of the
United States and the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/24/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed